Massachusetts, session 194th, H561.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 218 of chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “engineering” in the title, the 
following word: -, art. 
SECTION 2. Said section is hereby further amended by inserting after the word 
“engineering” in line 1, the following word: -, art.  
SECTION 3. Said section is hereby further amended in subsection (a) by inserting after 
the word “engineering” the following word: -, art.  
SECTION 4. Said section is hereby further amended by striking the word “STEM” each 
time it appears and inserting in place thereof: - STEAM. 
SECTION 5. Section 6H of chapter 40J of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “engineering”, the following 
word: -, art.  

of 2 13  SECTION 6. Said section is hereby further amended by striking the word “STEM” and 
inserting in place thereof: - STEAM. 
SECTION 7. Section 35QQ of chapter 10 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended in subsection (a) by inserting after the word “engineering” 
the following word: -, art.